Nevada, session 83, SB250.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. A health care provider shall:
1. Allow a patient unimpeded, secure access to his or her
electronic health records without a fee or charge.
-
*SB250_R1*

– 3 –
2. Allow a patient to forward his or her electronic health
records to any other person or entity without a fee or charge.
3. Ensure that, upon the request of a patient to furnish his or
her electronic health records to himself or herself or another
person or entity, the electronic health records of the patient are
transmitted to the requested person or entity in accordance with
NRS 629.062.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. NRS 439.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.580 1. Any local health officer or a deputy of a local
health officer who neglects or fails to enforce the provisions of this
chapter in his or her jurisdiction, or neglects or refuses to perform
any of the duties imposed upon him or her by this chapter or by the
instructions and directions of the Division shall be punished by a
fine of not more than $250.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 439.589, each person
who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or refuses or
neglects to obey any lawful order, rule or regulation of the:
(a) State Board of Health or violates any rule or regulation
approved by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS 439.350,
439.366, 439.410 and 439.460; or
(b) Director adopted pursuant to NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, and section 3 of this act,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 6. NRS 439.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.581 As used in NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and
section 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 439.582 to 439.585, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 7. NRS 439.588 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.588 1. A health information exchange shall not operate
in this State without first obtaining certification as provided in
subsection 2.
2. The Director shall by regulation establish the manner in
which a health information exchange may apply for certification and
the requirements for granting such certification, which must include,
without limitation, that the health information exchange demonstrate
its financial and operational sustainability, adherence to the privacy,
security and patient consent standards adopted pursuant to NRS
439.589 and capacity for interoperability with any other health
information exchange certified pursuant to this section.
3. The Director may deny an application for certification or
may suspend or revoke any certification issued pursuant to
subsection 2 for failure to comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 3 of this act or the
-
*SB250_R1*

– 4 –
regulations adopted pursuant thereto or any applicable federal or
state law.
4. When the Director intends to deny, suspend or revoke a
certification, he or she shall give reasonable notice to all parties by
certified mail. The notice must contain the legal authority,
jurisdiction and reasons for the action to be taken. A health
information exchange that wishes to contest the action of the
Director must file an appeal with the Director.
5. The Director shall adopt regulations establishing the manner
in which a person may file a complaint with the Director regarding a
violation of the provisions of this section.
6. The Director may impose an administrative fine against a
health information exchange which operates in this State without
holding a certification in an amount established by the Director by
regulation. The Director shall afford a health information exchange
so fined an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 233B.121.
7. The Director may adopt such regulations as he or she
determines are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 8. NRS 439.589 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.589 1. The Director, in consultation with health care
providers, third parties and other interested persons and entities,
shall by regulation prescribe a framework for the electronic
maintenance, transmittal and exchange of electronic health records,
prescriptions, health-related information and electronic signatures
and requirements for electronic equivalents of written entries or
written approvals in accordance with federal law. The regulations
must:
(a) Establish standards for networks and technologies to be used
to maintain, transmit and exchange health information, including,
without limitation, standards:
(1) That require:
(I) The use of networks and technologies that allow
patients to access electronic health records directly from the health
care provider of the patient and forward such electronic health
records electronically to other persons and entities; and
(II) The interoperability of such networks and
technologies in accordance with the applicable standards for the
interoperability of Qualified Health Information Networks
prescribed by the Office of the National Coordinator for Health
Information Technology of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services;
(2) To ensure that electronic health records retained or shared
are secure;
-
*SB250_R1*

– 5 –
(3) To maintain the confidentiality of electronic health
records and health-related information, including, without
limitation, standards to maintain the confidentiality of electronic
health records relating to a child who has received health care
services without the consent of a parent or guardian and which
ensure that a child’s right to access such health care services is not
impaired;
(4) To ensure the privacy of individually identifiable health
information, including, without limitation, standards to ensure the
privacy of information relating to a child who has received health
care services without the consent of a parent or guardian;
(5) For obtaining consent from a patient before retrieving the
patient’s health records from a health information exchange,
including, without limitation, standards for obtaining such consent
from a child who has received health care services without the
consent of a parent or guardian;
(6) For making any necessary corrections to information or
records;
(7) For notifying a patient if the confidentiality of
information contained in an electronic health record of the patient is
breached;
(8) Governing the ownership, management and use of
[electronic health records,] health-related information and related
data [;] and the management and use of electronic health records;
and
(9) For the electronic transmission of prior authorizations for
prescription medication;
(b) Ensure compliance with the requirements, specifications and
protocols for exchanging, securing and disclosing electronic health
records, health-related information and related data prescribed
pursuant to the provisions of the Health Information Technology for
Economic and Clinical Health Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 300jj et seq. and
17901 et seq., the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and other applicable federal and
state law; and
(c) Be based on nationally recognized best practices for
maintaining, transmitting and exchanging health information
electronically.
2. The standards prescribed pursuant to this section must
include, without limitation:
(a) Requirements for the creation, maintenance and transmittal
of electronic health records;
(b) Requirements for protecting confidentiality, including
control over, access to and the collection, organization and
-
*SB250_R1*

– 6 –
maintenance of electronic health records, health-related information
and individually identifiable health information;
(c) Requirements for the manner in which a patient may,
through a health care provider who participates in the sharing of
health records using a health information exchange, revoke his or
her consent for a health care provider to retrieve the patient’s health
records from the health information exchange;
(d) A secure and traceable electronic audit system for
identifying access points and trails to electronic health records and
health information exchanges;
(e) Requirements to minimize the need for a patient to
repeatedly provide demographic information, information relating
to his or her medical history and the list of medications that the
patient is currently taking or has taken in the past; and
[(e)] (f) Any other requirements necessary to comply with all
applicable federal laws relating to electronic health records, health-
related information, health information exchanges and the security
and confidentiality of such records and exchanges.
3. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section must not
require any person or entity to use a health information exchange.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6 and 7, the
Department and the divisions thereof, other state and local
governmental entities, health care providers, third parties, pharmacy
benefit managers and other entities licensed or certified pursuant to
title 57 of NRS shall maintain, transmit and exchange health
information in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
this section, the provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive,
and section 3 of this act and any other regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
5. The Federal Government and employees thereof, a provider
of health coverage for federal employees, a provider of health
coverage that is subject to the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., or a Taft-Hartley
trust formed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 186(c)(5) is not required to but
may maintain, transmit and exchange electronic information in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.
6. A health care provider may apply to the Department for a
waiver from the provisions of subsection 4 on the basis that the
health care provider does not have the infrastructure necessary to
comply with those provisions, including, without limitation, because
the health care provider does not have access to the Internet. The
Department shall grant a waiver if it determines that:
(a) The health care provider does not currently have the
infrastructure necessary to comply with the provisions of subsection
4; and
-
*SB250_R1*

– 7 –
(b) Obtaining such infrastructure is not reasonably practicable,
including, without limitation, because the cost of such infrastructure
would make it difficult for the health care provider to continue to
operate.
7. The provisions of subsection 4 do not apply to the
Department of Corrections.
8. A violation of the provisions of this section or any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto is not a misdemeanor.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 683A.174.
(b) “Third party” means any insurer, governmental entity or
other organization providing health coverage or benefits in
accordance with state or federal law.
Sec. 9. NRS 439.593 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.593 A health care provider who with reasonable care
transmits, accesses, utilizes, discloses, relies upon or provides to a
patient an apparently genuine electronic health record in accordance
with NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 3 of this act
and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto is immune from civil or
criminal liability for any decision concerning the provision of health
care to a patient and any civil or criminal liability resulting from the
provision of the record to a patient if:
1. The electronic health record is inaccurate;
2. The inaccuracy was not caused by the health care provider;
3. The inaccuracy resulted in an inappropriate health care
decision; and
4. The health care decision was appropriate based upon the
information contained in the inaccurate electronic health record.
Sec. 10. NRS 439.597 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.597 1. If a covered entity transmits electronically
individually identifiable health information in compliance with the
provisions of:
(a) The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191; and
(b) NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 3 of this act
and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
 which govern the electronic transmission of such information, the
covered entity is, for purposes of the electronic transmission,
exempt from any state law that contains more stringent requirements
or provisions concerning the privacy or confidentiality of
individually identifiable health information.
2. A covered entity that makes individually identifiable health
information available electronically pursuant to subsection 1 shall
allow any person to opt out of having his or her individually
-
*SB250_R1*

– 8 –
identifiable health information disclosed electronically to other
covered entities [,] or to prohibit any person or entity from
accessing his or her individually identifiable health information,
except:
(a) As required by the administrative simplification provisions
of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
Public Law 104-191.
(b) As otherwise required by a state law.
(c) That a person who is a recipient of Medicaid or insurance
pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program may not [opt] :
(1) Opt out of having his or her individually identifiable
health information disclosed electronically [.] ; or
(2) Prohibit any person or entity from accessing his or her
individually identifiable health information where access for that
person or entity is deemed necessary by the Department for
purposes of Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program.
3. As used in this section, “covered entity” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 45 C.F.R. § 160.103.
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
-
*SB250_R1*

– 9 –
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, and section 3 of this act, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to
689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS
689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6 and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033
to 689B.0369, inclusive, 689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive,
689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287 and 689B.500 apply to coverage
provided pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of
NRS 689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage
for active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
-
*SB250_R1*

– 10 –
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 13. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 3 of this act, 686A.135,
687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805,
689B.0353, 689B.255, 695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160,
695G.162, 695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665,
695G.167, 695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive,
695G.1714 to 695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200
to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405
and 695G.415, in the same manner as an insurer that is licensed
pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to comply with those
provisions.
Sec. 14. NRS 603A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603A.100 1. The provisions of NRS 603A.010 to 603A.290,
inclusive, do not apply to the maintenance or transmittal of
information in accordance with NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive,
and section 3 of this act, and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
2. A data collector who is also an operator, as defined in NRS
603A.330, shall comply with the provisions of NRS 603A.300 to
603A.360, inclusive.
-
*SB250_R1*

– 11 –
3. Any waiver of the provisions of NRS 603A.010 to
603A.290, inclusive, is contrary to public policy, void and
unenforceable.
Sec. 15. NRS 629.051 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.051 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
in regulations adopted by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS
652.135 with regard to the records of a medical laboratory and
unless a longer period is provided by federal law, each custodian of
health care records shall retain the health care records of patients as
part of the regularly maintained records of the custodian for 5 years
after their receipt or production. Health care records may be retained
in written form, or by microfilm or any other recognized form of
size reduction, including, without limitation, microfiche, computer
disc, magnetic tape and optical disc, which does not adversely affect
their use for the purposes of NRS 629.061. Health care records:
(a) Must, except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and 6 of
NRS 439.589, be created, maintained, transmitted and exchanged
electronically as required by subsection 4 of NRS 439.589; and
(b) May be created, authenticated and stored in a health
information exchange which meets the requirements of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 3 of this act and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. A provider of health care shall post, in a conspicuous place
in each location at which the provider of health care performs health
care services, a sign which discloses to patients that their health care
records may be destroyed after the period set forth in subsection 1.
3. When a provider of health care performs health care services
for a patient for the first time, the provider of health care shall
deliver to the patient a written statement which discloses to the
patient that the health care records of the patient may be destroyed
after the period set forth in subsection 1.
4. If a provider of health care fails to deliver the written
statement to the patient pursuant to subsection 3, the provider of
health care shall deliver to the patient the written statement
described in subsection 3 when the provider of health care next
performs health care services for the patient.
5. In addition to delivering a written statement pursuant to
subsection 3 or 4, a provider of health care may deliver such a
written statement to a patient at any other time.
6. A written statement delivered to a patient pursuant to this
section may be included with other written information delivered to
the patient by a provider of health care.
7. A custodian of health care records shall not destroy the
health care records of a person who is less than 23 years of age on
the date of the proposed destruction of the records. The health care
-
*SB250_R1*

– 12 –
records of a person who has attained the age of 23 years may be
destroyed in accordance with this section for those records which
have been retained for at least 5 years or for any longer period
provided by federal law.
8. The health care records of a patient are the property of the
patient.
9. If a health care licensing board receives notification from the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439.5895 that a provider of health care to which the health care
licensing board has issued a license is not in compliance with the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, the health care
licensing board may, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing
in accordance with the provisions of this title, require corrective
action or impose an administrative penalty in an amount not to
exceed the maximum penalty that the health care licensing board is
authorized to impose for other violations. The health care licensing
board shall not suspend or revoke a license for failure to comply
with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589.
[9.] 10. The provisions of this section, except for the
provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and subsection [8,] 9, do
not apply to a pharmacist.
[10.] 11. The State Board of Health shall adopt:
(a) Regulations prescribing the form, size, contents and
placement of the signs and written statements required pursuant to
this section; and
(b) Any other regulations necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
[11.] 12. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C,
641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS.
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) The State Board of Health with respect to licenses issued
pursuant to chapter 640D or 640E of NRS.
(b) “License” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 439.5895.
Sec. 16. NRS 719.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
719.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
provisions of this chapter apply to electronic records and electronic
signatures relating to a transaction.
2. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a transaction
to the extent it is governed by:
-
*SB250_R1*

– 13 –
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, a law
governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils or
testamentary trusts;
(b) The Uniform Commercial Code other than NRS 104.1306,
104.2101 to 104.2725, inclusive, and 104A.2101 to 104A.2532,
inclusive; or
(c) The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and
section 3 of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
3. The provisions of this chapter apply to an electronic record
or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of
this chapter under subsection 2 to the extent it is governed by a law
other than those specified in subsection 2.
4. A transaction subject to the provisions of this chapter is also
subject to other applicable substantive law.
Sec. 16.5. 1. On or before April 30, 2026, July 31, 2026,
October 31, 2026, and December 31, 2026, the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning the progress made by the
Department toward implementing the provisions of this act. The
report must include, without limitation:
(1) A summary of the actions taken during the immediately
preceding calendar quarter to implement the provisions of this act;
(2) Identification of any challenges encountered during the
implementation of the provisions of this act and the strategies that
the Department is using to address those challenges;
(3) A timeline of the dates that the Department has
completed tasks necessary to implement the provisions of this act
and the dates that the Department expects to complete such tasks
that are yet to be completed;
(4) An assessment of the adequacy of resources allocated for
implementing the provisions of this act, including, without
limitation, money, staff and technology; and
(5) Any recommendations for legislation or administrative
actions necessary to effectively implement the provisions of this act.
(b) Submit the report to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) For the reports submitted on or before April 30, 2026,
and July 31, 2026, the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health
and Human Services; and
(2) For the reports submitted on or before October 31, 2026,
and December 31, 2026, the Legislative Commission and the 84th
Session of the Legislature.
(c) Post the report on an Internet website maintained by the
Department.
-
*SB250_R1*

– 14 –
2. The Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services or his or her designee shall appear before the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services or the
Legislative Commission upon request to provide information
relating to any report submitted pursuant to this section.
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 19. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preliminary administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB250_R1*